Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2045.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 13-1209, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE13-1209. Drive by shooting; forfeiture; driver license revocation; classification; definitions A. A person commits drive by shooting by intentionally discharging a weapon from a motor vehicle at a person, another occupied motor vehicle or an occupied structure. B. Motor vehicles that are used in violation of this section are A motor vehicle from which a person commits a drive by shooting is subject to seizure for forfeiture in the manner provided for in chapter 39 of this title. C. Notwithstanding title 28, chapter 8, the judge shall order the surrender to the judge of any driver license of the convicted person and, on surrender of the license, shall invalidate or destroy the license and forward the abstract of conviction to the department of transportation with an order of the court revoking the driving privilege of the person for a period of at least one year but not more than five years. On receipt of the abstract of conviction and order, the department of transportation shall revoke the driving privilege of the person for the period of time ordered by the judge. D. Drive by shooting is a class 2 felony. E. As used in for the purposes of this section: 1. "Discharging a weapon from a motor vehicle" includes discharging a weapon from the immediate area of a motor vehicle that was used to transport the person to the scene of the discharge or the weapon that was discharged. 1. 2. "Motor vehicle" has the same meaning prescribed in section 28-101. 2. 3. "Occupied structure" has the same meaning prescribed in section 13-3101. END_STATUTE